vi: Chất liệu dây đai đỡ: Dyneema; Dynex; Sợi hỗn hợp; Nylon; Polyamide; Polyester; UHMWPE; Khác
ko: 슬링 소재: Dyneema; 다이넥스; 혼합 섬유; 나일론; 폴리아미드; 폴리에스터; UHMWPE; 기타
es: Material de la eslinga: Dyneema; Dynex; Fibras mixtas; Nailon; Poliamida; Poliéster; UHMWPE; Otro
sk-SK: Materiál popruhu: Dyneema; Dynex; Zmiešané vlákna; Nylón; Polyamid; Polyester; UHMWPE; Iné
zh-CN: 扁带材质: Dyneema; Dynex; 混合纤维; 尼龙; 聚酰胺; 聚酯纤维; UHMWPE; 其他
it: Materiale della fascia: Dyneema; Dynex; Fibre miste; Nylon; Poliammide; Poliestere; UHMWPE; Altro
sv: Material i rem: Dyneema; Dynex; Blandfibrer; Nylon; Polyamid; Polyester; UHMWPE; Övrigt
da: Slyngemateriale: Dyneema; Dynex; Blandede fibre; Nylon; Polyamid; Polyester; UHMWPE; Andet
el: Υλικό ιμάντα/σχοινιού μεταφοράς: Dyneema; Dynex; Ανάμικτες ίνες; Νάιλον; Πολυαμίδιο; Πολυεστέρας; UHMWPE; Άλλο
nb: Materiale i slynge: Dyneema; Dynex; Blandede fibre; Nylon; Polyamid; Polyester; UHMWPE; Annet
en: Sling material: Dyneema; Dynex; Mixed fibers; Nylon; Polyamide; Polyester; UHMWPE; Other
de: Schlingenmaterial: Dyneema; Dynex; Mischfasern; Nylon; Polyamid; Polyester; UHMWPE; Andere
ro-RO: Material al curelei: Dyneema; Dynex; Fibre mixte; Nailon; Poliamidă; Poliester; UHMWPE; Altul
cs: Materiál závěsu: Dyneema; Dynex; Směs vláken; Nylon; Polyamid; Polyester; UHMWPE; Jiný
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำสายโยง: Dyneema; Dynex; เส้นใยผสม; ไนลอน; โพลิอะไมด์; โพลีเอสเตอร์; UHMWPE; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Material zanke: Dyneema; Dynex; Mešana vlakna; Najlon; Poliamid; Poliester; UHMWPE; Drugo
ru: Материал стропы: Dyneema; Dynex; Смешанные волокна; Нейлон; Полиамид; Полиэстер; СВМПЭ; Другое
pt-BR: Fita, material: Dyneema; Dynex; Fibras mistas; Náilon; Poliamida; Poliéster; UHMWPE; Outro
ja: スリング素材: Dyneema; Dynex; 混合繊維; ナイロン; ポリアミド; ポリエステル; UHMWPE; その他
hu: Hordheveder anyaga: Dyneema; Dynex; Kevert szálak; Nylon; Poliamid; Poliészter; UHMWPE; Egyéb
lt-LT: Kilpų medžiaga: Dyneema; Dynex; Mišrūs pluoštai; Nailonas; Poliamidas; Poliesteris; UHMWPE; Kita
nl: Materiaal van sling: Dyneema; Dynex; Gemengde vezels; Nylon; Polyamide; Polyester; UHMWPE; Overig
pt-PT: Material da cinta: Dyneema; Dynex; Fibras mistas; Nylon; Poliamida; Poliéster; UHMWPE; Outro
fr: Matériau de la sangle: Dyneema; Dynex; Fibres mixtes; Nylon; Polyamide; Polyester; UHMWPE; Autre
bg-BG: Материал на ремъка: Dyneema; Dynex; Смесени влакна; Найлон; Полиамид; Полиестер; UHMWPE; Друг
tr: Askı malzemesi: Dyneema; Dynex; Karışık lifler; Naylon; Poliamid; Polyester; UHMWPE; Diğer
pl: Materiał temblaka: Dyneema; Dynex; Włókna mieszane; Nylon; Poliamid; Poliester; UHMWPE; Inne
zh-TW: 吊帶材質: Dyneema; Dynex; 混合纖維; 尼龍; 聚醯胺; 聚酯纖維; UHMWPE; 其他
hr-HR: Materijal remena: Dyneema; Dynex; Miješana vlakna; Najlon; Poliamid; Poliester; UHMWPE; Ostalo
fi: Nauhalenkin materiaali: Dyneema; Dynex; Sekakuidut; Nailon; Polyamidi; Polyesteri; UHMWPE; Muu